Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.350

Running start program—Enrollment for secondary and postsecondary credit.

A pupil may enroll in a course under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.390 for both high school credit and postsecondary credit.

[ 1994 c 205 s 6; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 406.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.